Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1225.
do enact as follows:AB1225,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table - See PDF for table AB1225,211Section 2. 20.435 (1) (dw) of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,2,141220.435 (1) (dw) Community primary care and outreach grants. The amounts 13in the schedule for grants for community primary care and hiring community 14health workers, nurses, or social workers under s. 46.93 (2). AB1225,315Section 3. 20.435 (4) (bb) of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,2,191620.435 (4) (bb) BadgerCare Direct stabilization. As a continuing 17appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the costs of administering the 18Medical Assistance program through direct, fee-for-service payments to providers 19as provided in s. 49.459 (2) and (5).AB1225,41Section 4. 20.435 (4) (bb) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2.... (this act), is repealed.AB1225,53Section 5. 20.435 (4) (xc) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 415, is amended to read:AB1225,3,14520.435 (4) (xc) Hospital assessment fund; hospital payments. From the 6hospital assessment fund, all moneys received from the assessment under s. 50.38 7(2) (a) and (b), except moneys appropriated under s. 20.285 (1) (qe) and (qj) and 8except amounts transferred to the Medical Assistance trust fund under s. 50.38 (8), 9to reimburse eligible hospitals for services provided under the Medical Assistance 10Program under subch. IV of ch. 49, make payments to health maintenance 11organizations under s. 49.45 (59), provide supplemental funds to rural hospitals 12under s. 49.45 (5m) (am), make supplemental payments to Level I adult trauma 13centers under s. 49.45 (6y) (ap), make supplemental payments to hospitals based on 14performance under s. 49.45 (6y) (ar), and make refunds under s. 50.38 (6).AB1225,615Section 6. 46.93 of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,3,171646.93 Community primary care and outreach grants. (1) In this 17section:AB1225,3,1818(a) “Community health center” has the meaning given in s. 250.15 (1) (a).AB1225,3,2019(b) “Community health worker” means an individual to whom all of the 20following apply:AB1225,3,22211. Is a trusted member of the community served by the individual or has an 22intimate understanding of that community.AB1225,3,24232. Serves as a liaison between health and social services and the community 24served by the individual.AB1225,4,213. Facilitates access to services and improves the quality and cultural 2competence of service delivery.AB1225,4,534. Assists in increasing health knowledge and self sufficiency through 4activities such as outreach, community education, informal counseling, social 5support, and advocacy.AB1225,4,106(c) “Community primary care” means a system of care under which 7community health workers, in collaboration with federally qualified health centers, 8visit patients in their homes at least once annually to chart health status and 9health care needs over time and coordinate with health care providers for the 10delivery of needed health care.AB1225,4,1211(d) “County department” means a county department under s. 46.215 or 1246.22.AB1225,4,1413(e) “Federally qualified health center” has the meaning given in s. 253.075 (1) 14(e).AB1225,4,1615(2) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (dw), the department shall 16award grants as follows:AB1225,4,1817(a) For the provision of community primary care in areas of this state with 18poor health outcomes and large health disparities.AB1225,4,2119(b) To community health centers or federally qualified health centers for 20hiring community health workers, nurses, or social workers to do all of the 21following:AB1225,5,2221. In coordination with a county department, perform community outreach 23and deliver medical care and care coordination services in the community to 1patients who, because of mental illness, homelessness, or other circumstances, are 2unlikely to obtain needed care and treatment.AB1225,5,432. Assist patients in enrolling in the Medical Assistance program under 4subch. IV of ch. 49.AB1225,75Section 7. 49.45 (2) (a) 2m. of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,5,7649.45 (2) (a) 2m. Ensure that medically necessary services are provided to 7Medical Assistance recipients in a timely and equitable manner. AB1225,88Section 8. 49.45 (2) (a) 2s. of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,5,12949.45 (2) (a) 2s. Recruit health care providers to participate in the Medical 10Assistance program in order to ensure there are sufficient culturally competent and 11geographically distributed health care providers available to meet Medical 12Assistance recipients’ needs.AB1225,913Section 9. 49.45 (2) (a) 3m. of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,5,181449.45 (2) (a) 3m. Maintain a call center and website to assist Medical 15Assistance recipients in locating providers; maintain a nurse consultation helpline 1624 hours per day, 7 days per week for Medical Assistance recipients; and contact 17Medical Assistance recipients who, based on claims data, have not had preventive 18visits to help them select a primary care provider.AB1225,1019Section 10. 49.45 (2) (a) 25. of the statutes is created to read:AB1225,5,212049.45 (2) (a) 25. Collaborate with individual health care providers to explore 21means of improving health care quality and reducing costs.AB1225,1122Section 11. 49.45 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1225,6,112349.45 (2) (b) 2. Contract Subject to s. 49.459 (2), contract with any 24organization whether or not organized for profit to administer, in full or in part, the 1benefits under the medical assistance program including prepaid health care. The 2department shall accept bids on contracts for administrative services and services 3evaluating the medical assistance program as provided in ch. 16, but may accept the 4contract deemed most advantageous for claims processing services; or, subject to s. 549.459 (2), contract with any insurer authorized under the insurance code of this 6state to insure the program in full or in part and on behalf of the department. The 7department shall submit a report each December 31 to the governor, the joint 8committee on finance and the chief clerk of each house of the legislature, for 9distribution to the appropriate standing committees under s. 13.172 (3), regarding 10the effectiveness of the management information system for monitoring and 11analyzing medical assistance expenditures.AB1225,1212Section 12. 49.45 (3) (c) of the statutes is repealed.AB1225,1313Section 13. 49.45 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1225 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1225 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1225 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1225 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1225: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting